North Carolina, session 2025, HB371.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-7 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c2) Provision of Materials in Additional Languages. – The Division shall provide an
option for applicants to (i) receive the driver license handbook prepared pursuant to G.S. 20-88.1
and (ii) take the written test required for licensure under this section in all of the following
languages:
(1) Khmer.
(2) Each language that is the primary language of at least two percent (2%) of the
State's population."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026.
*H371-v-1*